Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 19. Legislative Advisory Committee on the State House

§ 651.
Legislative Advisory Committee on the State House.

The Legislative Advisory Committee on the State House is created.

The Committee shall be composed of 13 members:

four members of the House of Representatives, appointed biennially by the Speaker of the House;

four members of the Senate, appointed biennially by the Committee on Committees;

the Chair of the Board of Trustees of the Friends of the Vermont State House;

the Director of the Vermont Historical Society;

the Director of the Vermont Council on the Arts;

the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services; and

the Sergeant at Arms.

The Committee shall biennially elect a chair from among its legislative members. A quorum shall consist of seven members.

The Committee shall meet at the State House at least one time when the General Assembly is in session and at least one time when the General Assembly is not in session or at the call of the Chair. The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall keep minutes of the meetings and maintain a file thereof.

The Committee shall have the assistance of the Office of Legislative Counsel and the Office of Legislative Operations.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 84

, § 25, eff. June 16, 2017;

2019, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. July 6, 2020;

2021, No. 20

, § 2;

2021, No. 50

, § 33, eff. June 1, 2021.

§ 652.
Per diem and expenses; legislative members.

For meetings held during adjournment of the General Assembly, the legislative members of the Committee shall be entitled to per diem compensation and expense reimbursement as provided in subsection 406(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 653.
Functions.

The Legislative Advisory Committee on the State House shall be consulted on all activities relating to the acquisition and care of paintings and historic artifacts and furnishings, and the refurbishing, renovation, preservation, and expansion of the building and its interior.
(a) (1) The Legislative Advisory Committee on the State House shall be consulted on all activities relating to the acquisition and care of paintings and historic artifacts and furnishings, and the refurbishing, renovation, preservation, and expansion of the building and its interior.

The Legislative Advisory Committee on the State House shall develop a plan for the acquisition or commission of artwork for the State House collection that represents Vermont’s diverse people and history, including diversity of gender, race, ethnicity, sexuality, and disability status.

The Sergeant at Arms and the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, in discharging responsibilities under subdivision 62(a)(6) of this title and

29 V.S.A. §§ 154(a)

and 154a, respectively, shall consider the recommendations of the Committee. The Committee’s recommendations shall be advisory only.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 84

, § 25, eff. June 16, 2017;

2019, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. July 6, 2020.